New York, session 2025-2026, A4756.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision (e) of section 1174-a of the vehicle and traf- 2 fic law, as added by chapter 145 of the laws of 2019, is amended to read 3 as follows: 4 (e) An owner liable for a violation of subdivision (a) of section 5 eleven hundred seventy-four of this article pursuant to a local law or 6 ordinance adopted pursuant to this section shall be liable for monetary 7 penalties in accordance with a schedule of fines and penalties to be set 8 forth in such local law or ordinance, except that if a city by local law 9 has authorized the adjudication of such owner liability by a parking 10 violations bureau, such schedule shall be promulgated by such bureau. 11 The liability of the owner pursuant to this section shall be two hundred 12 fifty dollars for [a first] each violation[, two hundred seventy-five 13 dollars for a second violation both of which were committed within a 14 period of eighteen months, and three hundred dollars for a third or 15 subsequent violation all of which were committed within a period of 16 eighteen months]; provided, however, that such local law or ordinance 17 may provide for an additional penalty not in excess of twenty-five 18 dollars for each violation for the failure to respond to a notice of 19 liability within the prescribed time period. 20 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 21 the amendments to subdivision (e) of section 1174-a of the vehicle and 22 traffic law made by section one of this act shall not affect the repeal 23 of such section and shall be deemed repealed therewith. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07310-01-5